Maine, session 132, LD1202.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§18-H is enacted to read:
18-H.
Education African American Studies Expenses and 20-A MRSA
Advisory Council Legislative Per Diem §14
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §14 is enacted to read:
§14. African American Studies Advisory Council
The African American Studies Advisory Council, referred to in this section as "the
advisory council," is established to serve as a resource to educators, schools and the
department to ensure the implementation of African American studies in accordance with
section 4706.
1. Members. The advisory council consists of the following 13 members:
A. Two Senators appointed by the President of the Senate and 2 members of the House
of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House;
B. One member appointed by the President of the Senate from a list provided by the
administrator of the Gerald E. Talbot Collection at the University of Southern Maine;
C. One member of the public with expertise in Maine African American culture and
history appointed by the Speaker of the House;
D. One member who is a representative of an African American civil rights
organization appointed by the President of the Senate from a list provided by a
statewide African American civil rights organization;
E. Four members appointed by the Commissioner of Education as follows:
(1) An elementary school teacher;
(2) A middle school teacher;
(3) A high school teacher; and
(4) A curriculum director with experience in African American studies; and
F. Two members from the University of Maine System who specialize in teacher
education appointed by the Chancellor of the University of Maine System. Of these 2
members, one must have experience teaching in African American studies.
To the extent practicable, appointing authorities under this subsection shall appoint
members with expertise in Maine African American culture and history.
2. Cochairs. The advisory council shall elect 2 of the members of the advisory council
who are Legislators as cochairs of the advisory council. The cochairs are authorized to
appoint subcommittees.
3. Terms; vacancy. Members of the advisory council serve 2-year terms. When a
vacancy occurs, the appointing authority shall fill the vacancy by appointing a member
from the same category as the member who vacated the advisory council and that member
continues to serve for the remainder of the term.
4. Quorum. A majority of the members of the advisory council constitutes a quorum.
Page 1 - 132LR1454(01)

5. Duties. The advisory council shall:
A. Assist school administrative units and educators in the exploration of a wide range
of educational materials and resources relating to African American studies;
B. Identify materials and resources for implementing African American studies;
C. Involve other knowledgeable organizations and individuals able and willing to assist
with the duties described in paragraphs A and B, including, but not limited to,
museums, the Maine State Archives and educators;
D. Make recommendations to the department regarding:
(1) African American studies curricula;
(2) Revisions to the African American studies component of the system of learning
results pursuant to section 6209;
(3) Funding of African American studies in school administrative units; and
(4) Opportunities for teacher professional development, training and technical
assistance to assist school administrative units and educators in implementing
African American studies; and
E. Use data gathered pursuant to the representative statewide sampling conducted by
the department under subsection 7 of African American studies curricula in school
administrative units to establish a baseline measure of the implementation of African
American studies in school administrative units.
6. Report. Beginning January 15, 2027 and annually thereafter, the advisory council
shall submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over education matters on the progress of the implementation of African American studies
and the results of the representative statewide sampling conducted by the department under
subsection 7 of African American studies curricula in school administrative units and any
baseline measures of the implementation of African American studies established by the
advisory council.
The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters
may report out a bill related to a report of the advisory council in the legislative session in
which it is received.
7. Staffing; sampling. The department shall provide staffing assistance to the advisory
council and shall conduct representative statewide sampling of African American studies
curricula in school administrative units.
8. Funding. The advisory council may seek and accept funding from any source,
public or private.
Sec. 3. Appointments to advisory council; convening. No later than 30 days
following the effective date of this Act, the appointing authorities shall make their
appointments to the African American Studies Advisory Council as established in the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 12004-I, subsection 18-H and notify the
Commissioner of Education. Within 30 days of the appointments being made, the
Commissioner of Education shall call and convene the first meeting of the advisory council
and preside over the election of cochairs.
Page 2 - 132LR1454(01)

Sec. 4. Professional development in African American studies. The
Department of Education shall develop professional development opportunities for
educators in African American studies.
Sec. 5. Teacher certification; study. The State Board of Education shall convene
a stakeholder group, including, but not limited to, representatives from the Department of
Education and higher education teacher preparation programs, to study the development of
an endorsement in African American studies on an educator credential or the inclusion of
a requirement for an African American studies course as a requirement for an educator
credential in this State. The State Board of Education shall submit a report to the Joint
Standing Committee on Education and Cultural Affairs no later than January 15, 2026.
Sec. 6. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Innovative Teaching and Learning Z394
Initiative: Provides one-time funds to support the work of the African American Studies
Advisory Council and to administer and provide grants to school administrative units to
expand or implement an African American studies curriculum. Funds appropriated for this
purpose do not lapse but must be carried forward to the next fiscal year to be used for the
same purpose.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $0
2240 Innovative Teaching and Learning Z394
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds for one Interdisciplinary Instruction Specialist position
to serve as a content specialist in African American studies and to provide outreach to
school administrative units with support and technical assistance in curriculum
development and implementation of African American studies.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $90,081 $122,986
All Other $9,410 $8,860
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $99,491 $131,846
3259
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

GENERAL FUND $1,099,491 $131,846
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $1,099,491 $131,846
Page 3 - 132LR1454(01)